Nevada, session 83, AB527-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 353.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6 and
7, on or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, all
-
*AB527_R1*

– 2 –
departments, institutions and other agencies of the Executive
Department of the State Government, and all agencies of the
Executive Department of the State Government receiving state
money, fees or other money under the authority of the State,
including those operating on money designated for specific purposes
by the Nevada Constitution or otherwise, shall prepare, on blanks
furnished them by the Chief, and submit to the Chief:
(a) The number of full-time equivalent positions within the
department, institution or agency.
(b) The number of full-time equivalent positions within the
department, institution or agency that have been vacant for at least
12 months, the number of months each such position has been
vacant and the reasons for each such vacancy.
(c) Any existing contracts for services the department,
institution or agency has with temporary employment services or
other persons, the proposed expenditures for such contracts in the
next 2 fiscal years and the reasons for the use of such services. If
such contracts include any privatization contracts, a copy of each of
those privatization contracts together with:
(1) A statement specifying the duration of the privatization
contracts;
(2) The number of privatization contracts proposed for the
next 2 fiscal years and the estimated expenditures for the
privatization contracts; and
(3) An analysis of each of the privatization contracts, which
includes, without limitation:
(I) For the preceding, current and next fiscal years, the
annual amount required to perform each of the privatization
contracts; and
(II) For the preceding and current fiscal years, the number
of persons the department, institution or agency employed pursuant
to the privatization contracts, reflected as the equivalent full-time
position if the persons were regularly employed by the department,
institution or agency, including the equivalent hourly wage and the
cost of benefits for each job classification.
(d) If the department, institution or agency has any existing
performance contracts that it has entered into pursuant to chapter
333A of NRS, any request to reinvest any savings realized under
such a contract for the next 2 fiscal years.
(e) Estimates of expenditure requirements of the department,
institution or agency, together with all anticipated income from fees
and all other sources, for the next 2 fiscal years compared with the
corresponding figures of the last completed fiscal year and the
estimated figures for the current fiscal year.
-
*AB527_R1*

– 3 –
2. The Chief shall direct that one copy of the forms submitted
pursuant to subsection 1, accompanied by every supporting schedule
and any other related material, be delivered directly to the Fiscal
Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau on or before
September 1 of each even-numbered year.
3. The Budget Division of the Office of Finance shall give
advance notice to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau of any conference between the Budget Division of
the Office of Finance and personnel of other state agencies
regarding budget estimates. A Fiscal Analyst of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau or his or her designated representative may attend
any such conference.
4. The estimates of expenditure requirements submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 must be classified to set forth the data
of funds, organizational units, and the character and objects of
expenditures by program or budgetary account and by category of
expense, and must include a mission statement and measurement
indicators in adequate detail to comply with the requirements of
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 353.205.
The organizational units may be subclassified by functions and by
agencies, bureaus or commissions, or in any other manner at the
discretion of the Chief.
5. If any department, institution or other agency of the
Executive Department of the State Government, whether its money
is derived from state money or from other money collected under
the authority of the State, fails or neglects to submit estimates of its
expenditure requirements as provided in this section, the Chief may,
from any data at hand in the Chief’s office or which the Chief may
examine or obtain elsewhere, make and enter a proposed budget for
the department, institution or agency in accordance with the data.
6. Agencies, bureaus, commissions and officers of the
Legislative Department, the Public Employees’ Retirement System
and the Judicial Department of the State Government shall submit to
the Chief for his or her information in preparing the proposed
executive budget the budgets which they propose to submit to the
Legislature. The Chief shall include the total amount of
appropriations included in the budgets submitted pursuant to this
subsection in the calculation of the reserve required pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 353.213.
7. On or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Tahoe Regional Planning Agency shall submit the budget which the
Agency proposes to submit to the Legislature to:
(a) The Chief for his or her information in preparing the
proposed executive budget. The Chief shall include the total
amount of appropriations included in the budget submitted
-
*AB527_R1*

– 4 –
pursuant to this subsection in the calculation of the reserve
required pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 353.213.
(b) The Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau.
8. The information provided by a department, institution or
agency pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 is a public record
and must be open to public inspection.
9. As used in this section, “privatization contract” means a
contract executed by or on behalf of a department, institution or
agency which authorizes a private entity to provide public services
which are:
(a) Substantially similar to the services performed by the public
employees of the department, institution or agency; and
(b) In lieu of the services otherwise authorized or required to be
provided by the department, institution or agency.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*AB527_R1*